Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,151
Annual report.

The
Department of Economic Development shall submit electronically an annual report regarding the
Site and Building Development Act to the Legislature no later than July 1
of each year beginning July 1, 2012. The report shall contain no information
that is protected by state or federal confidentiality laws.

Laws 2011, LB388, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 195.